Hawaii, session 2025, GM1120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that sex trafficking is a
form of modern-day slavery. According to a 2018 report
published by Arizona State University and the Hawaii state
commission on the status of women, one out of every eleven adult
male residents of Hawaii are online sex shoppers. The report
also estimated that there were 74,362 potential sex buyers in
Hawaii. Moreover, Imua Alliance, a victim service provider for
survivors of sex trafficking and sexual violence, estimates that
one hundred fifty establishments participate in the commercial
sex trade in the State, increasing the high risk for sex
trafficking. During the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic, a
service provider for sex trafficking victims in Hawaii reported
seeing a three hundred per cent increase in demand for victim
services.
The legislature additionally finds that Native Hawaiians
and Pacific Islanders are disproportionately overrepresented in
the State's sex trafficking survivor population. In a survey
2025-0550 HB HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO. Ill
conducted by the Hawaii state commission on the status of women
and Arizona State University, sixty-four per cent of individuals
identified as victims of sex trafficking reported at least
partial Native Hawaiian ancestry. According to the report,
''[t]he overutilization of Native Hawaiians to meet sex buyer
demand may be directly linked to structural economic coercion
and vulnerabilities connected to land dispossession, exposure to
sexual violence, hypersexualization, incarceration, cultural
dislocation, intergenerational trauma, mental and emotional
distress, racism, poverty, and ongoing inequities."
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to support
survivors of sex trafficking by:
(1) Authorizing civil claims to be made against a person,
business, business owner, or business operator that
profits from sexual exploitation or sex trafficking;
and
(2) Extending the statute of limitations for civil claims
related to sexual exploitation or sex trafficking to
ten years.
SECTION 2. Chapter 663J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending its title to read as follows:
2025-0550 HB HMSO 2
IIIIIIIHIIIIIIIIIII

Page 3
H.B. NO. Ill
" [-E-] CHAPTER 663J[+]
LIABILITY FOR COERCION INTO [PROSTITUTION] SEX TRAFFICKING AND
SEXUAL EXPLOITATION"
SECTION 3. Section 663J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-1 Title. This chapter may be cited as the Sex
Trafficking and [Prostitution] Sexual Exploitation Coercion
Liability Act."
SECTION 4. Section 663J-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-2 Definitions. As used in this chapter:
"Business" includes a transient accommodation or any other
commercial activity.
"Coerce" means to use or threaten to use any form of
domination, restraint, or control for the purpose of causing an
individual to engage in or remain in [prostitution] sexual
exploitation or to relinquish earnings derived from
[prost-i-tution. ] sexual exploitation. Coercion exists if the
totality of the circumstances establish the existence of
domination, restraint, or control that would have the reasonably
foreseeable effect of causing an individual to engage in or
2025-0550 HB HMSO
iniiiiiiiiHiiiDiiiii

Page 4 H.B. NO. ill
remain in [prootitution] sexual exploitation or to relinquish
earnings derived from [prootitution.] sexual exploitation.
[-"■P-remoting prootitution” moano promoting prootitution ao
provided in ooction 712-1203.
"Prootitution" hao t-he-oame^nean-ing as provided in oection
■71-2-1200. ]
"Sex trafficking" [tes—the—seme—meaniftg—ae-^r^vided—in]
means any act included under section 712-1202[—] or 712-1203.
"Sexual exploitation" has the same meaning as
"prostitution" as that offense is described in section 712-
1200."
SECTION 5. Section 663J-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-3 Cause of action for coercion into [preetitutien]
sexual exploitation or sex trafficking. An individual [has-]
shall have a cause of action against a person, business,
business owner, or business operator who:
(1) Coerced the individual into [prashihut-ieft] sexual
exploitation or to remain in [prestihutieftT-] sexual
exploitation, or subjected the individual to sex
trafficking;
2025-0550 HB HMSO

imiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 5 H.B. NO. HI
(2) Used coercion to collect or receive any of the
individual's earnings derived from [prostitution]
sexual exploitation or from being the subject of sex
trafficking; [ee]
(3) Hired, or attempted to hire^ the individual to engage
in [prostitution/] sexual exploitation, when a
reasonable person would believe that the individual
was coerced into [prostitution] sexual exploitation by
another person or was being subjected to sex
trafficking[—]; or
(4) Profited from coercing the individual into sexual
exploitation or subjecting the individual to sex
trafficking."
SECTION 6. Section 663J-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [+1 §663J-4 [-3-] Evidence. Acts that may serve as evidence
in support of a claim under section 663J-3 include but are not
limited to:
(1) Physical force or threats of physical force;
(2) Physical or mental torture;
2025-0550 HB HMSO

■niiiiiiiiinii

Page 6
H.B. NO. Ill
(3) Leading an individual to believe that the individual
will be protected from violence or arrest;
(4) Kidnapping;
(5) Blackmail;
(6) Extortion;
(7) Threat of criminal prosecution for any violation of
’? the law;
(8) Threat of interference with parental rights;
(9) Restriction or interference with speech or
communication with others;
(10) Isolation;
(11) Exploitation of pornographic performance;
(12) Interference with opportunities for education;
(13) Destroying property of the individual;
(14) Restriction of movement; [of]
(15) In the case of a person coerced while a minor:
(A) Exploiting needs for food, shelter, safety,
affection, or intimate relationship;
(B) Exploiting a condition of developmental
disability, cognitive limitation, affective
disorder, or substance dependency;
2025-0550 HB HMSO

iiiiiiiniHHi

Page 7 H.B. NO. Ill
(C) Promise of legal benefit, such as posting bail,
procuring an attorney, protecting from arrest, or
promising unionization;
(D) Promise of financial rewards; or
(E) Defining the terms of an individual's employment
or working conditions in a manner that is likely
to lead to the individual's use in
[p-roDtitution. ] sexual exploitation; or
(16) Disregarding notification or other indications that an
individual is being coerced into sexual exploitation
or subjected to sex trafficking on premises controlled
by the person, business, business owner, or business
operator."
SECTION 7. Section 663J-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-5 Damages. An individual entitled to bring an
action under section 663J-3 may recover all of the following
damages:
(1) Economic damages proximately caused by coercion into
[prootitution] sexual exploitation or being the
subject of sex trafficking;
■202n5-n055i0H HBH HMiSOii

Page 8 H.B. NO. m
(2) Noneconomic damages proximately caused by coercion
into [prootitution] sexual exploitation or being the
subject of sex trafficking;
(3) Exemplary damages;
(4) Reasonable attorney's fees; and
(5) Costs of suit, including reasonable expenses for
expert testimony."
SECTION 8. Section 663J-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) In the discretion of the court, two or more
individuals may join in one action under this chapter as
plaintiffs if their respective actions involve a person^
business, business owner, or business operator who [ongagoo in
promoting prootitution by eooro-ien or oubjecting] coerced the
Individuals into sexual exploitation, subjected the individuals
to sex trafficking, or profited from coercing the individuals
into sexual exploitation or subjecting the individuals to sex
trafficking."
SECTION 9. Section 663J-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-0550 HB HMSO

linnniiiiiiM

Page 9 H.B. NO. Ill
"§663J-7 Statute of limitations. (a) A claim under this
chapter [may] shaJ^ not be brought against a person, business,
business owner, or business operator more than [-si*] ten years
after an act of [pr-omoting prostitution by] coercion into sexual
exploitation or an act of sex trafficking by that person.
(b) The limitation period provided for in this chapter
[ie] shall be tolled:
(1) During the minority of the individual who engages in
[prostitution;] sexual exploitation; or
(2) Any time there is a criminal offense investigation
being actively conducted against the defendant by a
governmental agency or there is a criminal offense
charge, information, or indictment pending against the
defendant."
SECTION 10. Section 663J-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-8 Stay of action. On motion by a governmental
agency involved in an investigation or prosecution for
[promoting prostitution] sexual exploitation or sex trafficking,
an action brought under this chapter shall be stayed until the
2025-0550 HB HMSO

niiHiiiiiHiii

Page 10 H.B. NO. Ill
completion of the criminal investigation or prosecution that
gave rise to the motion for a stay of the action."
SECTION 11. Section 663J-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§663J-9 Other remedies preserved. The remedies provided
under this chapter [de] shadJ. not restrict the right of any
individual to bring an action under an^ other law, including
common law, to recover damages arising out of the use of the
individual in [prootitution,] sexual exploitation, or subjecting
the individual to sex trafficking, or the coercion incident to
the individual being used in [proS'tit-ution] sexual exploitation
or sex trafficking; nor [deee] shall this chapter limit or
restrict the liability of any person, business, business owner,
or business operator under aj^ other law."
SECTION 12. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 13. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 14. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

2025-0550 HB HMSO 10

Page 11 H.B. NO. IH
INTRODUCED BY:
JAN 1 A 2025 ’
2025-0550 HB HMSO 11
lllll■llnllllllill

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 22nd day of April , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 111
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 28, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: AM » 4 W5
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate